Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2599.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-2 of the General Laws entitled "Railroad, Steamboat, and Bridge
Police" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-2-9. Privacy protections for railway employees.
(a) Any police report involving a railroad fatality and all communications between police
officers and railroad crew members involved in such fatality, shall not be made public and shall be
maintained by the police department that responds to such fatality, in a manner that shall ensure
confidentiality; provided, however, that all such reports shall be accessible at all reasonable times,
upon written request, to:
(1) The host railroad;
(2) The railroad of employ of any employee mentioned in such reports; and
(3) Any other person authorized by judicial order to obtain such information, if access to
such report is necessary in the performance of their duties; and provided, further, that all such
reports shall be accessible at all reasonable times, upon written or electronic mail request to law
enforcement officers, or the office of attorney general.
(b) Communications between police officers and railroad employees concerning any
railroad fatality incident may be shared with any person listed in subsection (a) of this section, if
such access is necessary to the performance of their duties.
(c) A violation of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one

year or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004856
========
LC004856 - Page 2 of 3